Hawaii statutes.
§287-10 Application to nonresidents and
unlicensed drivers. In case the driver involved in an accident within the
State has no license or permit, the driver shall not be allowed a license or
permit until the driver has complied with the requirements of this chapter to
the same extent that would be necessary if at the time of the accident the
driver held such a license or permit. [L 1949, c 393, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§160-89; HRS §287-10; am L 1970, c 164, §3; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next